Maryland, session 2025, HB0309.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Safety
3–534.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “PEER SUPPORT PROGRAM” MEANS A PROGRAM PROVIDED BY A
LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY OR THE FRATERNAL ORDER OF POLICE THAT
PROVIDES COUNSELING SERVICES FROM A PEER SUPPORT SPECIALIST TO A LAW
ENFORCEMENT OFFICER.
(3) “PEER SUPPORT SPECIALIST” MEANS A LAW ENFORCEMENT
OFFICER OR A MEMBER OF THE FRATERNAL ORDER OF POLICE WHO:
(I) HAS RECEIVED TRAINING IN PEER SUPPORT, INCLUDING
EMOTIONAL AND MORAL SUPPORT TO LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICERS WHO HAVE
BEEN INVOLVED IN OR EXPOSED TO AN EMOTIONALLY TRAUMATIC EXPERIENCE IN
THE COURSE OF DUTY AS A LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER; AND
(II) IS DESIGNATED BY THE LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY TO
PROVIDE THE SERVICES DESCRIBED IN ITEM (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH.
– 1 –

Ch. 510 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(B) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, A
PEER SUPPORT SPECIALIST OR PEER SUPPORT PROGRAM PARTICIPANT MAY NOT
DISCLOSE THE CONTENTS OF ANY WRITTEN OR ORAL COMMUNICATION REGARDING
A PEER SUPPORT INTERACTION.
(2) PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION DOES NOT APPLY IF:
(I) THE COMMUNICATION CONTAINS:
1. AN EXPLICIT THREAT OF SUICIDE, THE DISCLOSURE
OF WHICH THE PEER SUPPORT SPECIALIST BELIEVES IS NECESSARY TO AVOID A
SUICIDE ATTEMPT;
2. AN EXPLICIT THREAT OF IMMINENT AND SERIOUS
BODILY HARM OR DEATH TO A CLEARLY IDENTIFIED OR IDENTIFIABLE INDIVIDUAL;
3. INFORMATION RELATING TO THE ABUSE OR NEGLECT
OF A CHILD OR VULNERABLE ADULT, OR ABUSE OR NEGLECT THAT IS OTHERWISE
REQUIRED TO BE REPORTED BY LAW; OR
4. THE ADMISSION OF CRIMINAL CONDUCT;
(II) THE DISCLOSURE IS AUTHORIZED BY EACH PEER SUPPORT
PROGRAM PARTICIPANT WHO WAS A PARTY TO THE COMMUNICATION; OR
(III) A COURT OF COMPETENT JURISDICTION ISSUES AN ORDER
OR SUBPOENA REQUIRING THE DISCLOSURE OF THE COMMUNICATION.
(3) BEFORE THE INITIAL PEER SUPPORT INTERACTION WITH A PEER
SUPPORT PROGRAM PARTICIPANT, A PEER SUPPORT SPECIALIST SHALL INFORM
THE PEER SUPPORT PROGRAM PARTICIPANT IN WRITING OF THE CONFIDENTIALITY
PROVISIONS IN THIS SUBSECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 13, 2025.
– 2 –